Washington statutes.
RCW 19.86.040

Monopolies and attempted monopolies declared unlawful.

It shall be unlawful for any person to monopolize, or attempt to monopolize or combine or conspire with any other person or persons to monopolize any part of trade or commerce.

[ 1961 c 216 s 4.]